Oklahoma, session 2025, SB759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 2001, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2001. A. This act shall be known and may be cited as


the “Parents’ Bill of Rights”.


B. This state, any school district or school district board of


education, any other political subdivision of this state, or any


other governmental entity shall not infringe on the fundamental


right of parents to direct the upbringing, education, health care,


and mental health of their children without demonstrating that the


compelling governmental interest as applied to the child involved is


of the highest order, is narrowly tailored, and is not otherwise


served by a less restrictive means.



Req. No. 292 Page 2


C. As used in the Parents’ Bill of Rights, “parent” means the


natural or adoptive parent or legal guardian of a minor child. A


person whose parental rights have been terminated by a court of this


state shall not be considered a parent to that child for the


purposes of the Parents’ Bill of Rights.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 2002, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2002. A. All parental rights are reserved to a parent


of a minor child without obstruction or interference from this


state, any political subdivision of this state, any other


governmental entity, or any other institution, including, but not


limited to, the following rights:


1. The right to direct the education of the minor child;


2. All rights of parents identified in Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, including the right to access and review all school


records relating to the minor child;


3. The right to direct the upbringing of the minor child;


4. The right to direct the moral or religious training of the


minor child;


5. The right to make healthcare health care decisions for the


minor child, unless otherwise prohibited by law;


6. The right to access and review all medical records of the


minor child, whether held by the state, any political subdivision of


this state, or any other governmental entity or nongovernmental

Req. No. 292 Page 3


entity, unless otherwise prohibited by law or the parent is the


subject of an investigation of a crime committed against the minor


child and a law enforcement official requests that the information


not be released;


7. The right to consent in writing before a biometric scan of


the minor child is made, shared, or stored;


8. The right to consent in writing before any record of the


minor child’s blood or deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) is created,


stored, or shared, except as required by Sections 1-516 and 1-524.1


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or unless authorized pursuant


to a court order;


9. The right to consent in writing before the state or any of


its political subdivisions makes a photograph, video, or voice


recording of the minor child, unless the photograph, video, or voice


recording is made during or as a part of a court proceeding, by law


enforcement officers during or as part of a law enforcement


investigation, during or as part of a forensic interview in a


criminal or Department of Human Services investigation, or to be


used solely for any of the following:


a. safety demonstrations, including the maintenance of


order and discipline in the common areas of a school


or on student transportation vehicles,


b. a purpose related to a legitimate academic or


extracurricular activity,

Req. No. 292 Page 4


c. a purpose related to regular classroom instruction,


d. security or surveillance of buildings or grounds, and


e. a photo identification card; and


10. The right to be notified promptly if an employee of this


state, any political subdivision of this state, any other


governmental entity, or any other institution suspects that a


criminal offense has been committed against the minor child by


someone other than a parent, unless the incident has first been


reported to law enforcement and notification of the parent would


impede a law enforcement or Department of Human Services


investigation. This paragraph does not create any new obligation


for school districts and charter schools to report misconduct


between students at school, such as fighting or aggressive play,


that is routinely addressed as a student disciplinary matter by the


school.


B. This section does not authorize or allow a parent to engage


in conduct that is unlawful or to abuse or neglect a child in


violation of the laws of this state. This section shall not be


construed to apply to a parental action or decision that would end


life. This section does not prohibit courts, law enforcement


officers, or employees of a government agency responsible for child


welfare from acting in their official capacity within the reasonable


and prudent scope of their authority. This section does not



Req. No. 292 Page 5


prohibit a court from issuing an order that is otherwise permitted


by law.


C. Any attempt to encourage or coerce a minor child to withhold


information from the child’s parent shall be grounds for discipline


of an employee of this state, any political subdivision of this


state, or any other governmental entity, except for encouragement by


law enforcement personnel when a parent is the subject of an


investigation of a crime committed against the minor child.


D. Unless those rights have been legally waived or legally


terminated, parents have inalienable rights that are more


comprehensive than those listed in this section. The Parents’ Bill


of Rights does not prescribe all rights of parents. Unless


otherwise required by law, the rights of parents of minor children


shall not be limited or denied. The Parents’ Bill of Rights shall


not be construed to apply to a parental action or decision that


would end life.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 2003, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2003. A. 1. The State Board of Education shall


develop training materials for the purpose of providing in-service


training to all school district personnel including administrators


and school district board of education members to make clear the


legislative intent of the Parents’ Bill of Rights and what is



Req. No. 292 Page 6


expected of them with regard to their responsibility to protect


parents’ civil and constitutional rights pursuant to this section.


2. School district boards of education shall use the training


materials developed pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection to


train all school district employees at the beginning of every school


year. Failure to receive the training required by this paragraph


shall not be considered a legal defense to an alleged violation of


parental rights.


B. The board of education of a school district, in consultation


with parents, teachers, and administrators, shall develop and adopt


a policy to promote the involvement of parents and guardians of


children enrolled in the schools within the school district,


including:


1. A plan for parent participation in the schools which is


designed to improve parent and teacher cooperation in such areas as


homework, attendance, and discipline;


2. Procedures by which parents may learn about the course of


study for their children and review learning materials, including


the source of any supplemental educational materials;


3. Procedures by which parents who object to any learning


material or activity on the basis that it is harmful may withdraw


their children from the activity or from the class or program in


which the material is used. Objection to a learning material or


activity on the basis that it is harmful includes objection to a

Req. No. 292 Page 7


material or activity because it questions beliefs or practices in


sex, morality, or religion;


4. If a school district offers any sex education curricula


pursuant to Section 11-105.1 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes or


pursuant to any rules adopted by the State Board of Education,


procedures to opt out of a school district from providing requiring


written consent from a parent for a school district to provide sex


education instruction to a child if the child’s parent provides


written objection to the child’s participation in the sex education


curricula. In the absence of written consent from a parent, a child


shall be considered automatically withdrawn from the sex education


curricula;


5. Procedures by which parents will be notified in advance of


and given the opportunity to withdraw approve, in writing, the


participation of their children from in any instruction or


presentations regarding sexuality in courses other than formal sex


education curricula pursuant to Section 11-105.1 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. In the absence of written consent from a parent,


a child shall be considered automatically withdrawn from any


instruction or presentations regarding sexuality;


6. Procedures by which parents will be notified in advance of


and given the opportunity to approve, in writing, the participation


of their children in any instruction or presentations on sexual


orientation or gender identity. In the absence of written consent

Req. No. 292 Page 8


from a parent, a child shall be considered automatically withdrawn


from instruction or presentations on sexual orientation or gender


identity. Instruction or presentations on sexual orientation or


gender identity shall not be included in any course of instruction


offered in public schools in this state, including, without


limitation, the standard course of study and support materials,


locally developed curriculum, supplemental instruction, textbooks,


or other supplementary materials, regardless of whether such


instruction or presentations are provided by school personnel or


third parties;


7. Procedures by which parents may learn about the nature and


purpose of clubs and activities that are part of the school


curriculum, as well as extracurricular clubs and activities that


have been approved by the school or the school district board of


education and procedures by which parents will be notified of and


given the opportunity to approve, in writing, the participation of


their child in any clubs or activities. In the absence of written


consent from a parent, a child shall be considered ineligible to


participate in clubs or activities; and


7. 8. Procedures by which parents may learn about parental


rights and responsibilities under the laws of this state, including


the following:


a. the right to opt out of in to a sex education


curriculum if one is provided by the school district,

Req. No. 292 Page 9


b. open enrollment rights,


c. the right to opt out of assignments pursuant to this


section,


d. the right to be exempt from the immunization laws of


the state pursuant to Section 1210.192 of Title 70 of


the Oklahoma Statutes,


e. the promotion requirements prescribed in Section


1210.508E of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes


provisions of the Strong Readers Act,


f. the minimum course of study and competency


requirements for graduation from high school


prescribed in Section 11-103.6 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


g. the right to opt out of instruction on the acquired


immune deficiency syndrome pursuant to Section 11-


103.3 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


h. the right to review test results,


i. the right to participate in gifted programs pursuant


to Sections 1210.301 through 1210.308 of Title 70 of


the Oklahoma Statutes,


j. the right to inspect instructional materials used in


connection with any research or experimentation


program or project pursuant to Section 11-106 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes,

Req. No. 292 Page 10


k. the right to receive a school report card,


l. the right to receive the attendance requirements


prescribed in Section 10-106 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


m. the right to public review of courses of study and


textbooks,


n. the right to public review of library books and


materials used in the classrooms or any other school


room accessible to students,


o. the right to be excused from school attendance for


religious purposes,


o. p. policies related to parental involvement pursuant to


this section,


p. q. the right to participate in parent-teacher


associations and organizations that are sanctioned by


the board of education of a school district, and


q. r. the right to opt out of any data collection


instrument at the district level including those that


would capture data for inclusion in the state


longitudinal student data system except what is


necessary and essential for establishing a student’s


public school record.


B. C. 1. The board of education of a school district shall


adopt a policy to make available for public inspection printed

Req. No. 292 Page 11


copies of information required by this section including the board


of education’s policy manual and any parent or student handbook.


2. The board of education of a school district may adopt a


policy to provide to parents the public the information required by


this section in an electronic form including the board of


education’s policy manual and any parent or student handbook.


C. D. A parent shall submit a written request for information


pursuant to this section during regular business hours to either the


school principal at the school site or the superintendent of the


school district at the office of the school district. Within ten


(10) seven (7) days of receiving the request for information, the


school principal or the superintendent of the school district shall


either deliver the requested information to the parent or submit to


the parent a written explanation of the reasons for the denial of


the requested information. If the request for information is denied


or the parent does not receive the requested information within


fifteen (15) ten (10) days after submitting the request for


information, the parent may submit a written request for the


information to the board of education of a school district, which


shall formally consider the request at the next scheduled public


meeting of the board if the request can be properly noticed on the


agenda. If the request cannot be properly noticed on the agenda,


the board of education of a school district shall formally consider


the request at the next subsequent public meeting of the board.

Req. No. 292 Page 12


E. A school district board of education shall adopt procedures


for a parent to notify the principal of the school in which his or


her child is enrolled regarding concerns about the school district’s


procedures or practices adopted to implement the Parents’ Bill of


Rights and a process for resolving concerns within seven (7) days of


receiving the notification from a parent. If the parental concerns


have not been resolved within twenty-one (21) days of receiving the


notification from a parent, the school district shall provide a


statement of the reasons for not resolving the concerns. If a


parental concern submitted pursuant to this subsection is not


satisfactorily resolved by the school district within thirty (30)


days, a parent may:


1. Notify the State Board of Education of the concern and


request a parental concern hearing. The Board shall promulgate


rules establishing procedures for parental concern hearings, which


shall include at a minimum the following:


a. the State Board of Education shall appoint a qualified


hearing officer, who shall be admitted to practice law


in this state pursuant to Section 12 of Title 5 of the


Oklahoma Statutes with demonstrated experience in


education or administrative law within the last five


(5) years,


b. the hearing officer shall determine facts related to


the dispute over the school district’s procedure or

Req. No. 292 Page 13


practice, consider information provided by the school


district and the parent, and render a recommended


decision for resolution to the State Board of


Education within thirty (30) days of the concern being


referred to the hearing officer,


c. the State Board of Education shall approve or reject


the recommended decision for resolution at its next


regularly scheduled board meeting held within seven


(7) days of receipt of the recommended decision, and


d. the school district shall pay the cost of the hearing


officer and any associated costs incurred by the State


Board of Education for conducting the parental concern


hearing; or


2. Bring an action against the school district for injunctive


relief and a declaratory judgment that the district’s procedure or


practice violates any provision of the Parents’ Bill of Rights. The


court may award injunctive relief to a parent and shall award


reasonable attorney fees and costs to a parent awarded injunctive


relief.


F. Each school district board of education shall adopt


procedures to notify parents at the beginning of each school year of


the procedures to exercise parental remedies as outlined in


subsection E of this section.



Req. No. 292 Page 14


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 2004, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2004. A. 1. Except as otherwise provided by law, no


person, corporation, association, organization, state-supported


institution, or individual employed by any of these entities may


procure, solicit to perform, arrange for the performance of, perform


surgical procedures, or perform a physical examination upon a minor


or prescribe any prescription drugs to a minor without first


obtaining a written consent of a parent or legal guardian of the


minor. Provided, however, that if written consent is provided to a


school district for assessment or treatment, such consent shall be


effective for the school year for which it is granted and shall be


renewed each subsequent school year. If an assessment or treatment


is performed through telemedicine at a school site and if consent


has been provided by the parent and is currently effective, the


health professional shall not be required to verify that the parent


is at the site.


2. Notwithstanding the written consent provisions of paragraph


of this subsection, an employee of a school district who does not


possess the proper professional license issued by this state shall


not perform an assessment of the physical needs of a minor without


first obtaining the written consent of a parent of the minor.


B. Except as otherwise provided by law, no hospital as defined


in Section 1-701 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes may permit

Req. No. 292 Page 15


surgical procedures to be performed upon a minor in its facilities


without first having received a written consent from a parent or


legal guardian of the minor.


C. The provisions of this section shall not apply when it has


been determined by a physician that an emergency exists and that it


is necessary to perform such surgical procedures for the treatment


of an injury, illness or drug abuse, or to save the life of the


patient, or when such parent or other adult authorized by law to


consent on behalf of a minor cannot be located or contacted after a


reasonably diligent effort.


D. The provisions of this section shall not apply to an


abortion, which shall be governed by the provisions of Sections 1-


740 through 1-740.6 and Sections 1-744 through 1-744.6 of Title 63


of the Oklahoma Statutes or any successor statute.


E. A person who violates a provision of this section is guilty


of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment of not more than one (1) year in


the county jail, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 2005, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2005. A. 1. Except as otherwise provided by law or a


court order, no person, corporation, association, organization, or


state-supported institution, or any individual employed by any of


these entities, may procure, solicit to perform, arrange for the

Req. No. 292 Page 16


performance of, or perform an assessment for mental health therapy


on a minor without first obtaining the written consent of a parent


or a legal guardian of the minor child. Provided, however, that if


written consent is provided to a school district for assessment or


treatment, such consent shall be effective for the school year for


which it is granted and shall be renewed each subsequent school


year. If an assessment or treatment is performed through


telemedicine at a school site and if consent has been provided by


the parent and is currently effective, the health professional shall


not be required to verify that the parent is at the site. However,


a child shall not be seen without consent. For the purposes of this


section, “mental health treatment” includes therapy and counseling


services but does not include counseling on college and career


readiness.


2. Notwithstanding the written consent provisions of paragraph


of this subsection, an employee of a school district who does not


possess the proper professional license issued by this state shall


not perform an assessment of the mental or psychological needs of a


minor without first obtaining the written consent of a parent of the


minor.


B. This section does not apply when an emergency exists that


requires a person with the proper professional license issued by


this state to perform mental health screening or provide mental



Req. No. 292 Page 17


health treatment to prevent serious injury to or save the life of a


minor child.


C. Each school district board of education shall adopt


procedures to notify a parent:


1. Prior to or contemporaneous with changes in services, notice


of changes in services, or monitoring related to his or her child’s


mental, emotional, or physical health or well-being and the school


district’s ability to provide a safe and supportive learning


environment for the child; and


2. Prior to any changes in the name or pronoun used for a child


in school records or by school personnel.


D. A person who violates this section is guilty of a


misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment of not more than one (1) year in


the county jail, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-105.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 11-105.1. A. All curriculum and materials including


supplementary materials which will be used to teach or will be used


for or in connection with a sex education class or program which is


designed for the exclusive purpose of discussing sexual behavior or


attitudes, or any test, survey, or questionnaire whose primary


purpose is to elicit responses on sexual behavior or attitudes shall


be available through the superintendent or a designee of the school

Req. No. 292 Page 18


district for inspection by parents and legal guardians of the


student who will be involved with the class, program or, test,


survey, or questionnaire. Such curriculum, materials, classes,


programs, tests, surveys, or questionnaires shall include


information about consent and shall have as one of its their primary


purposes the teaching of or informing students about the practice of


abstinence. For the purposes of this section, “consent” shall have


the same meaning as that provided by Section 113 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. The superintendent or a designee of the school


district shall provide prior written notification to the parents or


legal guardians of the students involved of their right to inspect


the curriculum and material and of their obligation to notify the


right of parents or legal guardians to provide the school in writing


written consent if they do not want their child to participate in


the class, program, test, survey, or questionnaire. Each local


board of education shall determine the means of providing written


notification to the parents and guardian legal guardians which will


ensure effective notice in an efficient and appropriate manner. No


student shall be required to participate in a sex education class or


program which discusses sexual behavior or attitudes if a parent or


legal guardian of the student objects in writing to does not provide


written consent for such participation. If the type of program


referred to in this section is a part of or is taught during a


credit course, a student may be required to enroll in the course but

Req. No. 292 Page 19


shall not be required to receive instruction in or participate in


the program if a parent or legal guardian objects in writing does


not provide written consent.


B. The superintendent or a designee of a school district in


which sex education is taught or a program is offered which is


designed for the exclusive purpose of discussing sexual behavior or


attitudes shall approve all curriculum and materials which will be


used for such education and any test, survey, or questionnaire whose


primary purpose is to elicit responses on sexual behavior or


attitudes used in the school prior to their use in the classroom or


school. The teacher involved in the class, program, testing, or


survey shall submit the curriculum, materials, tests, or surveys to


the superintendent or a designee for approval prior to their use in


the classroom or school. This section shall not apply to those


students enrolled in classes, programs, testings, or surveys offered


through an alternative education program.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 8. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-292 EB 1/19/2025 5:42:47 AM



Req. No. 292 Page 20